csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+1Sg: ganawaabamishiikeg
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamishiikeg
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+1Sg: ganawaabamishiikan
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaakan
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaakan
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: MISSING
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3PlProx: ganawaabamaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+3SgProx: ganawaabamaakang
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+1Sg: ganawaabamishikegon
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaakegon
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaakegon
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+1Sg: ganawaabamishiken
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaaken
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamaaken
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: ganawaabamishikaangen
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3PlProx: [ganawaabamaasiwaadaanig,ganawaabamaasiidaanig]
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaasiwaadaa
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+3SgProx: [ganawaabamaasiwaadaa,ganawaabamaasiidaa]
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+1Sg: ganawaabamishik
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimik
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabamik
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+1Sg: ganawaabamishin
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamim
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+3SgProx/3PlProx: ganawaabam
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg/2Pl+Excl: [ganawaabamishinaan,ganawaabamishinaang]
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3PlProx: ganawaabamaadaanig
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgObv/3PlObv: ganawaabamimaadaa
     ganawaabam+VTA+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+3SgProx: ganawaabamaadaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: niwaabamigosiinaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: niwaabamigosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: giwaabamisiimwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: giwaabamisiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: niwaabamigosiidogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: niwaabamigosiidog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+1Sg: niwaabamigoosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+1Sg: niwaabamigonaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+1Sg: niwaabamigonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+1Sg: giwaabamimwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+1Sg: giwaabaminaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+1Sg: niwaabamigodogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+1Sg: niwaabamigodog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+1Sg: niwaabamigoonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: niwaabamigosiinan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: niwaabamigosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: giwaabamisiim
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: giwaabamisiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: niwaabamigosiig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: niwaabamigosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+1Sg: niwaabamigoosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+1Sg: niwaabamigonan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+1Sg: niwaabamigon
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+1Sg: giwaabamim
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: giwaabam
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+1Sg: niwaabamigoog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+1Sg: niwaabamig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+1Sg: niwaabamigoo
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: niwaabamigosiinaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: niwaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: giwaabamisiimwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: giwaabamisiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: niwaabamigosiibaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: niwaabamigosiiban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+1Sg: niwaabamigoosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+1Sg: niwaabamigonaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+1Sg: niwaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+1Sg: giwaabamimwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+1Sg: giwaabaminaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+1Sg: niwaabamigobaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+1Sg: niwaabamigoban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+1Sg: niwaabamigoonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: giwaabamigosiinaawaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: giwaabamigosiinaawaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: giwaabamisinooninimwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: giwaabamigosiiwaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: giwaabamigosiiwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Pl: giwaabamigoosiimwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Pl: giwaabamigoosiimwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Pl: giwaabamigonaawaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Pl: giwaabamigonaawaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Pl: giwaabamininimwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Pl: giwaabamigowaadogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Pl: giwaabamigowaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Pl: giwaabamigoomwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Pl: giwaabamigoomwaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: giwaabamigosiinaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: giwaabamigosiinaawaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: giwaabamisinooninim
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: giwaabamigosiiwaag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: giwaabamigosiiwaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Pl: giwaabamigoosiim
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Pl: giwaabamigoosiim
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Pl: giwaabamigonaawaan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Pl: giwaabamigonaawaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Pl: giwaabamininim
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Pl: giwaabamigowaag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Pl: giwaabamigowaa
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Pl: giwaabamigoom
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Pl: giwaabamigoom
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: giwaabamigosiinaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: giwaabamigosiinaawaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: giwaabamisinooninimwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: giwaabamigosiiwaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: giwaabamigosiiwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Pl: giwaabamigoosiimwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Pl: giwaabamigoosiimwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Pl: giwaabamigonaawaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Pl: giwaabamigonaawaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Pl: giwaabamininimwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Pl: giwaabamigowaabaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Pl: giwaabamigowaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Pl: giwaabamigoomwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Pl: giwaabamigoomwaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: giwaabamigosiinaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: giwaabamigosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: giwaabamisinooninaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: giwaabamigosiidogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: giwaabamigosiidog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+2Sg: giwaabamigoosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+2Sg: giwaabamigoosiinaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+2Sg: giwaabamigonaadogenan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+2Sg: giwaabamigonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+2Sg: giwaabamininaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+2Sg: giwaabamigodogenag
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+2Sg: giwaabamigodog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+2Sg: giwaabamigoonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+2Sg: giwaabamigoonaadog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: giwaabamigosiinan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: giwaabamigosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: giwaabamisinoon
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: giwaabamigosiig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: giwaabamigosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+2Sg: giwaabamigoosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+2Sg: giwaabamigoosiin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+2Sg: giwaabamigonan
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+2Sg: giwaabamigon
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: giwaabamin
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+2Sg: giwaabamigoog
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+2Sg: giwaabamig
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+2Sg: giwaabamigoo
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+2Sg: giwaabamigoo
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: giwaabamigosiinaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: giwaabamigosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: giwaabamisinooninaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: giwaabamigosiibaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: giwaabamigosiiban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+2Sg: giwaabamigoosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+2Sg: giwaabamigoosiinaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+2Sg: giwaabamigonaabanen
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+2Sg: giwaabamigonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+2Sg: giwaabamininaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+2Sg: giwaabamigobaneg
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+2Sg: giwaabamigoban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+2Sg: giwaabamigoonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+2Sg: giwaabamigoonaaban
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: niwaabamimaasiidogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiwaawaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiidogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: owaabamaasiwaawaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: owaabamaasiidogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: niwaabamimaasiwaanaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiwaanaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3PlObv: waabamimaasiidogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3PlObv: niwaabamimaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaawaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlObv: giwaabamimaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3PlObv: owaabamaawaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3PlObv: owaabamaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlObv: niwaabamimaanaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaanaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlObv: waabamimaadogena'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: niwaabamimaasii'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiwaawaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasii'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: owaabamaasiwaawaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: owaabamaasii'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: niwaabamimaasiwaanaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiwaanaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlObv: waabamimaasiiwa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlObv: niwaabamimaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaawaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlObv: giwaabamimaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlObv: owaabamaawaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3PlObv: owaabamaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlObv: niwaabamimaanaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaanaa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlObv: waabamimaawa'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: niwaabamimaasiibane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiwaawaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiibane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: owaabamaasiwaawaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: owaabamaasiibane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: niwaabamimaasiwaanaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaasiwaanaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlObv: waabamimaasiibane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlObv: niwaabamimaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlObv: giwaabamimaawaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlObv: giwaabamimaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3PlObv: owaabamaawaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3PlObv: owaabamaabane'
     waabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlObv: niwaabamimaanaabane'
